Louisiana, session 2026, HB515.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:2202(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2202. Minimum bid prices; sale of adjudicated property; sale of tax lien held by
the political subdivision; sale of immovable property to enforce a tax lien
held by a political subdivision; direct sales
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection A of this Section, the
governing authority of each political subdivision may allow an adjoining landowner
to purchase adjudicated property for any price set by the governing authority without
public bidding at a public meeting of the governing authority; provided, that the
governing authority of an applicable political subdivision determines that the
adjoining landowner has maintained the adjudicated property for a period of one year
prior to the sale. Such a sale shall be deemed a public sale under the provisions of
this Subpart.
(2) The governing authority of each political subdivision may elect to sell
adjudicated property with an appraised value of less than fifty thousand dollars
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 515 ENROLLED
directly to a buyer at a fixed price without public bidding, but only if the political
subdivision offered the property at a public sale for purchase by the highest bidder
in accordance with Subsection A of this Section within the previous twelve months.
The price of each property offered for direct sale shall be established by resolution
or ordinance of the governing authority. Any direct sale authorized by this
Paragraph shall be deemed a public sale in accordance with the provisions of this
Subpart.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.